Utah statutes.
67-19d-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Board of trustees" or "board" means the board of trustees created in Section 67-19d-202.

(2)  "Income" means the revenues received by the state treasurer from investments of the trust fund principal.

(3)  "Trust fund" means the State Post-Retirement Benefits Trust Fund created by Section 67-19d-201.

